test/src/morphology/N-irgwm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - irgõm: # Noun 159 'eng /est algus/fin' - full paradigm
     irgõm+N+Sg+Nom: irgõm
     irgõm+N+Sg+Gen: irgõm
     irgõm+N+Sg+Par: irgõmt
     irgõm+N+Sg+Dat: irgõmõn
     irgõm+N+Sg+Ins: irgõmõks
     irgõm+N+Sg+Ill: irgõmõ
     irgõm+N+Sg+Ela: irgõmst
     irgõm+N+Pl+Nom: irgõmõd
     irgõm+N+Pl+Gen: irgõmõd
     irgõm+N+Pl+Par: irgõmidi
     irgõm+N+Pl+Dat: irgõmõdõn
     irgõm+N+Pl+Ins: irgõmõdõks
     irgõm+N+Pl+Ill: irgõmiž
     irgõm+N+Pl+Ela: irgõmist
